src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:iiminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:iiminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:iimikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iima' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iiman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iiman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:iimishining EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:iimishining EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:iimishing EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:iimishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:iimishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:iimishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_VV                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary
0:%>%> NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_VV                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_VV                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_VV, Prefix: N, Order: Other                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Stems
chiimichaa:chiimichaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
daangwew:daangwew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
dawemaaw:dawemaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
dikwaa:dikwaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
dindawaaw:dindawaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
iij'aya'aa:iij'aya'aaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
iiji-bimaadizii:iiji-bimaadiziiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
iiji-oshkinawe:iiji-oshkinawew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
iijikwew:iijikwew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
iitaaw:iitaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
maamaa:maamaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
mishoo:mishoow2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
na'aangii:na'aangiiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
ndikwaaw:ndikwaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
ndoodoow:ndoodoow2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
ngwiimew:ngwiimew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
niidakiwenzii:niidakiwenziiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
niiji-zaziikizii:niiji-zaziikiziiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
niijii:niijiiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
niinge:niingew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
niitaaw:niitaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
nimishoo:nimishoow2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
nishiimisaa:nishiimisaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
nookoo:nookoow2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
odedeyimaaw:odedeyimaaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
opasew:opasew2 NAD_Class=NAD_VV_Boundary ;
